Washington statutes.
RCW 10.27.110

Duration of sessions—Extensions.

The length of time which a grand jury may sit after being convened shall not exceed sixty days. Before expiration of the sixty day period and any extensions, and upon showing of good cause, the court may order the grand jury panel extended for a period not to exceed sixty days.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 67 s 11.]